Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1417
Teaching and demonstration; use of dead human bodies.

The board shall have the privileges extended to them for the use of bodies for dissection, demonstrating, and teaching under the requirements of the State Anatomical Board for the distribution and delivery of dead human bodies.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 97, p. 481;

C.S.1929, § 71-1306;

Laws 1931, c. 123, § 1, p. 357;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 71-1306;

R.S.1943, § 71-199;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 71-199;

Laws 1993, LB 187, § 17;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 153;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1305;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 553.

State Anatomical Board requirements, see sections 71-1001 to 71-1007.